North Carolina statutes. Chapter 115D. Community Colleges.
Article 1. General Provisions for State Administration.
), effective January 1, 2012, in sub-subdivision (b)(2)g. and in the last paragraph of subsection (c1), substituted “Division of Adult Correction of the Department of Public Safety” for ‘Department of Correction”; in sub-subdivision (b)(2)g., substituted “Division’s” to “Department” and
“Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction” for “Division of Community Corrections”; and
substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety” for “Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention” in subdivision (b)(2)h.

Session Laws 2011-145, s. 31.2, effective July 1, 2011, in the first sentence of subsection (s), inserted “establish” and added “including fees for retesting.”

Session Laws 2011-391, s. 18(a) and (b), effective July 1, 2011, substituted “Communications” for “Citizens” in subdivision (b)(2)e.; and deleted “including students in early college and middle college high school programs” from the end of subdivision (b)(12).

Session Laws 2012-83, s. 41, effective June 26, 2012, deleted “of the Division of Adult Correction” following “Division’s Section of Community Corrections” from subdivision (b)(2)(g).

Session Laws 2012-142, s. 8.3(a) and 8.8, effective July 1, 2012, added subdivision (b)(2)d1., deleted “(v) (vi) municipal county, or State law-enforcement officers” following subdivision (b)(2)e., added subdivision (b)(2)i. and deleted the first paragraph of subsection (o) which read: “The General Assembly finds that additional data are needed to determine the adequacy of multicampus and off-campus center funds; therefore, multicampus colleges and colleges with off-campus centers shall report annually, beginning September 1, 2005, to the Community Colleges System Office on all expenditures by line item of funds used to support their multicampuses and off-campus centers. The Community Colleges System Office shall report on these expenditures to the Education Appropriation Subcommittees of the House of Representatives and the Senate, the Office of State Budget and Management, and the Fiscal Research Division by December 1 of each year.”

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 10.4(b), effective July 26, 2013, added subsection (v). For applicability, see Editor’s note.

Session Laws 2013-360, ss. 10.6 and 10.12, effective July 1, 2013, repealed subdivision (b)(11), which read “Up to six hours of credit instruction and one course of noncredit instruction per academic semester for senior citizens age 65 or older who are qualified as legal residents of North Carolina”; and added the last sentence in subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 10.15(a), effective July 1, 2015, repealed subsection (m), which read “The State Board of Community Colleges shall maintain an education program auditing function that conducts an annual audit of each community college operating under the provisions of this Chapter. The purpose of the annual audit shall be to ensure that college programs and related fiscal operations comply with State law, State regulations, State Board policies, and System Office guidance. The State Board of Community Colleges shall require auditors of community college programs to use a statistically valid sample size in performing program audits of community colleges. All education program audit findings shall be forwarded to the college president, local college board of trustees, the State Board of Community Colleges, and the State Auditor.”

Session Laws 2013-382, s. 9.1(c), effective August 21, 2013, substituted “North Carolina Human Resources Act” for “State Personnel Act” in the section heading and in the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection (a); and substituted “State Human Resources Commission” for “State Personnel Commission” in the last sentence of subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 28(e), effective August 11, 2014, in subsection (s), substituted “an adult high school equivalency diploma” for “the General Education Development (GED)” in the first sentence and in the second sentence deleted “GED” following “costs of the” and substituted “adult high school equivalency diplomas” for “GED certificates.”

Session Laws 2015-167, s. 2.5, effective July 23, 2015, added subsection (w).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 8.41(k), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “115C-296.12” for “G.S. 115C-296(c1)” in subsection (p).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 10.2(a), effective July 1, 2015, added subdivision (b)(15).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 10.5(a), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “curriculum courses” for “technical education, health care, developmental education, and STEM-related courses” in subsection (v). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 10.6(b), effective July 1, 2015, rewrote subsection (m). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.3(a), effective July 1, 2016, added subdivision (b)(16). See editor’s note for applicability.

Session Laws 2016-94, s. 10.4(a), effective July 1, 2016, added subdivision (2a). See editor’s note for applicability.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 7.22(g), effective July 1, 2017, added subsection (x).

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 9.8(a), effective July 1, 2017, rewrote subdivision (b)(16). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-57, s. 9.10(a), (c), effective July 1, 2017, deleted “curriculum” preceding “courses” in subdivision (b)(12); and added subsection (b2). For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-155, s. 2(a), added subsection (y). For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(hhhhhh), effective December 1, 2017, in subdivision (b)(2)g., inserted “and Juvenile Justice” and substituted “Division” for “Division’s Section of Community Corrections,” and deleted former subdivision (b)(2)h., which read: “The Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety for the training of employees required to be certified under Chapter 17C of the General Statutes and the rules of the Criminal Justice and Training Standards Commission.”

Session Laws 2017-189, s. 6(g), effective July 27, 2017, in subsection (p) substituted “Article 17D of Subchapter V of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes” for “the lateral entry program of study established under G.S. 115C-296.12”, and substituted “through residency licensure.” for “by lateral entry.” For effective date and applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2017-212, s. 2.1, effective October 8, 2017, substituted “March 15” for “January 15” preceding “of each year” in the last sentence of subsection (x).

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 17.1(c), effective July 1, 2018, added sub-subdivision (b)(2)j.

Session Laws 2018-97, s. 5.1, effective July 1, 2018, in sub-subdivision (b)(2)j., substituted “Criminal Justice Standards Division” for “Division of Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards” and “North Carolina Criminal Justice Education and Training Standards Commission” for “Criminal Justice and Training Standards Commission” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Session Laws 2019-165, ss. 1.5(a), 3.3(b), 3.4, effective July 26, 2019, added the last sentence of the first paragraph of subsection (f); and rewrote the second paragraph of subsection (f); added the last sentence in subsection (x); and deleted “State Board of” preceding “Community Colleges” and inserted “System Office” in subsection (b2).

Session Laws 2019-235, s. 3.2(a), effective July 1, 2019, added sub-subdivision (b)(2)f1. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2019-235, s. 3.4(b), effective July 1, 2019, inserted “or prisoners in local jails” in the second sentence of subsection (c); and deleted “contact hours rather than” following “on the basis of” in the first sentence of subsection (c1).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 6.3(a), effective July 1, 2021, rewrote subsection (x). For applicability, see editor's note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(
lll
), in sub-subdivision (b)(2)g., substituted “Division of Prisons of the Department of Adult Correction and the Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” near the beginning, and substituted “Divisions” for “Division” near the middle. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.